Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.230

Evidentiary effect of copy of filed record.

A certification from the secretary of state accompanying a copy of a filed record is conclusive evidence that the copy is an accurate representation of the original record on file with the secretary of state.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1207.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.